Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB801.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 301(c) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 301. * * *(c) (1) The terms "injury" and "personal injury," as used in this act, shall be construed to mean an injury to an employe, regardless of his previous physical condition, except as provided under [subsection (f)] subsections (f) and (h), arising in the course of his employment and related thereto, and such 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 disease or infection as naturally results from the injury or is aggravated, reactivated or accelerated by the injury; and wherever death is mentioned as a cause for compensation under this act, it shall mean only death resulting from such injury and its resultant effects, and occurring within three hundred weeks after the injury. The limitation with respect to a disease under this paragraph having to occur within three hundred weeks of the last date of exposure shall not apply to claims filed under subsection (h)(1). The term "injury arising in the course of his employment," as used in this article, shall not include an injury caused by an act of a third person intended to injure the employe because of reasons personal to him, and not directed against him as an employe or because of his employment; nor shall it include injuries sustained while the employe is operating a motor vehicle provided by the employer if the employe is not otherwise in the course of employment at the time of injury; but shall include all other injuries sustained while the employe is actually engaged in the furtherance of the business or affairs of the employer, whether upon the employer's premises or elsewhere, and shall include all injuries caused by the condition of the premises or by the operation of the employer's business or affairs thereon, sustained by the employe, who, though not so engaged, is injured upon the premises occupied by or under the control of the employer, or upon which the employer's business or affairs are being carried on, the employe's presence thereon being required by the nature of his employment.(2) The terms "injury," "personal injury," and "injury arising in the course of his employment," as used in this act, shall include, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, 20250SB0801PN0870 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 occupational disease as defined in section 108 of this act: Provided, That whenever occupational disease is the basis for compensation, for disability or death under this act, it shall apply only to disability or death resulting from such disease and occurring within three hundred weeks after the last date of employment in an occupation or industry to which he was exposed to hazards of such disease: And provided further, That if the employe's compensable disability has occurred within such period, his subsequent death as a result of the disease shall likewise be compensable. This limitation shall not apply to claims filed under subsection (h)(1). The provisions of this paragraph (2) shall apply only with respect to the disability or death of an employe which results in whole or in part from the employe's exposure to the hazard of occupational disease after June 30, 1973 in employment covered by The Pennsylvania Workmen's Compensation Act. The employer liable for compensation provided by section 305.1 or section 108, subsections (k), (l), (m), (o), (p), (q) or (r), shall be the employer in whose employment the employe was last exposed for a period of not less than one year to the hazard of the occupational disease claimed. In the event the employe did not work in an exposure at least one year for any employer during the three hundred week period prior to disability or death, the employer liable for the compensation shall be that employer giving the longest period of employment in which the employe was exposed to the hazards of the disease claimed.* * *(h) (1) Notwithstanding the limitations with respect to a disease under subsection (c)(1) having to occur within three hundred weeks of the last date of exposure, and under subsection 20250SB0801PN0870 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c)(2) with respect to disability or death resulting from an occupational disease having to occur within three hundred weeks after the last date of employment in an occupation or industry to which a claimant was exposed to the hazards of disease, claims filed for a disease under subsection (c)(1) or (2) for which the time period between exposure to the hazard of disease in the workplace and manifestation of disease is greater than three hundred weeks must be filed within three years of the date on which a claimant is diagnosed with the disease. It shall be a claimant's burden to prove that the disease for which compensation is sought has a latency period of more than three hundred weeks. If an employee is receiving or is eligible to receive occupational disease benefits at the time of the employee's death, a death or survivor claim must be brought within three hundred weeks of the date of death. If the deceased employee was not receiving benefits or was not eligible to receive benefits at the time of death, a death claim must be filed within three hundred weeks of a diagnostic document that shows the presence of the occupational disease and filed within three years of the death date.(2) The following shall apply to claims made under this subsection, where the last date of employment in the occupation or industry to which a claimant was exposed to the hazards of disease occurred prior to the effective date of this paragraph:(i) An insurer shall not be liable for a compensable claim under this subsection that was not compensable prior to the effective date of this paragraph as the result of the limitation with respect to a disease under subsection (c)(1) having to occur within three hundred weeks of the last date of exposure or the limitation under subsection (c)(2) with respect to 20250SB0801PN0870 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disability or death resulting from an occupational disease having to occur within three hundred weeks after the last date of employment in an occupation or industry to which a claimant was exposed to the hazards of disease.(ii) An insured or self-insured employer who receives a notice or petition for a compensable claim under this subsection, which the insurer is not required to pay under subparagraph (i), may refer the claim to the Workers' Compensation Security Fund, established under the act of July 1, 1937 (P.L.2532, No.470), known as the "Workers' Compensation Security Fund Act." An employer who refers a claim shall immediately report the claim to the Workers' Compensation Security Fund and send written notice by certified mail to the claimant, the insurer and the Workers' Compensation Security Fund within forty-five (45) days of receipt of the notice or petition, or within forty-five (45) days from the time the employer was informed by the insurer that the insurer is not required to pay the claim under subparagraph (i). The notice shall include all claim information received by the employer, contact information for the claimant and any other information required by the Workers' Compensation Security Fund.(iii) The Workers' Compensation Security Fund shall pay compensable claims submitted under subparagraph (ii) in accordance with this act, if the employer has provided notice under subparagraph (ii) and the claim is compensable under this subsection. The Workers' Compensation Security Fund shall not be required to pay any claim that is not authorized under this subsection or any claim under this subsection where the last date of employment in the occupation or industry to which a claimant was exposed to the hazards of disease occurred on or 20250SB0801PN0870 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 after the effective date of this paragraph, unless required by the "Workers' Compensation Security Fund Act." The Workers' Compensation Security Fund may establish regulations, policies and procedures for the submission of claims under subparagraph (ii), including the form of the notice, and the administration of claims.(iv) The Insurance Commissioner shall include in his regular report to the Governor a statement of the expenses of administering claims paid under this subsection, along with the information required under section 14 of the "Workers' Compensation Security Fund Act."(3) This subsection shall not apply to claims filed under section 108(r).Section 1.1. Section 303 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 303. * * *(c) This act provides the exclusive remedy for any injury or disease that may arise out of hazardous occupational exposure, whether the disease is compensable or not.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), this act shall apply to claims filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) The addition of sections 301(h) and 303(c) of the act shall apply to civil claims existing as of the effective date of this paragraph, if the plaintiff was barred from seeking compensation for an occupational disease by the time limit under section 301(c)(2), for which compensation has not been paid or awarded.Section 3. The provisions of this act shall be applied 20250SB0801PN0870 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 retroactively to the date on which the last injurious exposure occurred. As a result, any claim filed on or after the effective date of this section may be based on hazardous occupational exposure that occurred prior to the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0801PN0870 - 7 - 123456